New York, session 2025-2026, S681.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 201-a of the labor law, as amended by chapter 460 2 of the laws of 1973, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 201-a. Fingerprinting or mandatory iris and retina scanning of 4 employees prohibited. Except as otherwise provided by law, no person, as 5 a condition of securing employment or of continuing employment, shall be 6 required to be fingerprinted or undergo mandatory iris and retina scan- 7 ning. This provision shall not apply to employees of the state or any 8 municipal subdivisions or departments thereof, or to the employees of 9 legally incorporated hospitals, supported in whole or in part by public 10 funds or private endowment, or to the employees of medical colleges 11 affiliated with such hospitals or to employees of private proprietary 12 hospitals. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02797-01-5